Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.175

Issuing, amending, or terminating a marketing order—Limitation on public hearings or referendums.

The director shall not be required to hold a public hearing or a referendum more than once in any twelve-month period on petitions to issue, amend, or terminate a commodity marketing order if any of the following circumstances are present:

(1) The petition proposes to establish a marketing order or agreement for the same commodity;

(2) The petition proposes the same or a similar amendment to a marketing order or agreement; or

(3) The petition proposes to terminate the same marketing order or agreement.

[ 2002 c 313 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.